District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1201.01

Findings and declarations.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 101, 41 DCR 5333
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2081(a), 57 DCR 181
1981 Ed., § 9-801.
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2081(a) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2081(a) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Short title: Section 2080 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle I of title II of the act may be cited as the “Washington Convention Center Authority and Sports and Entertainment Commission Merger Amendment Act of 2009”.